Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2015
Proficiency
examination, defined.

Proficiency examination
means the Physician Assistant National Certifying Examination administered
by the National Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 673;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 39.